Tennessee, session 114, SB1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-113(g), is amended by
deleting "A violation of subsection (a)" and substituting "Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2),
a violation of subsection (a)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-113(g), is amended by
designating the current language as subdivision (g)(1) and adding the following subdivision
(g)(2):
(2)
(A) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony if:
(i) The offender knowingly violated a lifetime order of protection
issued pursuant to § 36-3-627; and
(ii) The conviction on which the lifetime order of protection is
based was for an offense involving the use of force against a victim.
(B) Any sentence of incarceration imposed must be served consecutively
to the sentence for any other offense that is based in whole or in part on the
same factual allegations. However, the sentencing judge may specifically order
the sentences for offenses arising out of the same facts to be served
concurrently.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-627(a)(1), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
SB1938
011082
- 1 -

(D) A felony offense committed in another state that would constitute an offense
listed in this subdivision (a)(1) if committed in this state. If an offense in a jurisdiction
other than this state is not identified as one (1) of the offenses listed in this subdivision
(a)(1), then it must be considered an offense listed in this subdivision (a)(1) if the
elements of the offense are the same as the elements of the comparable offense in this
state.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare
requiring it, and apply to acts committed on or after that date. Section 3 takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011082